Utah statutes.
32B-6-204.   Specific licensing requirements for full-service restaurant license.

(1)  To obtain a full-service restaurant license a person shall comply with Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process.

(2) (a)  A full-service restaurant license expires on October 31 of each year.

(b)  To renew a person's full-service restaurant license, a person shall comply with the renewal requirements of Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, by no later than September 30.

(3) (a)  The nonrefundable application fee for a full-service restaurant license is $330.

(b)  The initial license fee for a full-service restaurant license is $2,200.

(c)  The renewal fee for a full-service restaurant license is in the following amount:

 

Gross Cost of Liquor in Previous License Year for the Licensee

Renewal Fee

 



under $5,000

$935

 



equals or exceeds $5,000 but less than $10,000

$1,155

 



equals or exceeds $10,000 but less than $25,000

$1,650

 



equals or exceeds $25,000

$1,925

(4)  The bond amount required for a full-service restaurant license is the penal sum of $10,000.



Amended by Chapter 1, 2012 Special Session 4

